Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 11.5
COLORADO LONG-TERM CARE
OMBUDSMAN PROGRAM

Law reviews:

For article, "Long-term

C

are Ombudsman Records:

C

onfidentiality for the Frail and Vulnerable", see 31 Colo. Law. 73 (Nov. 2002).

Section

26-11.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Long-term Care Ombudsman Act".

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1401, § 1, effective April 10.

26-11.5-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby recognizes that the former state department of social services, currently the state department of human services, pursuant to the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", as amended, has established a state long-term care ombudsman program.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that it is the public policy of this state to encourage community contact and involvement with patients, residents, and clients of long-term care facilities and PACE programs.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that in order to comply with the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", as amended, and effectively assist patients, residents, and clients of long-term care facilities in the assertion of their civil, human, and legal rights, the structure of a state long-term care ombudsman program and the powers and duties thereunder shall be specifically defined.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1401, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2707, § 274, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1118, § 2, effective June 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-11.5-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 11.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Local ombudsman" means an individual trained and designated as qualified by the state long-term care ombudsman to act as a representative of the office of the state long-term care ombudsman.

(2.5) "Local PACE ombudsman" means the person or persons trained and designated as qualified by the state PACE ombudsman to serve in areas of the state where PACE programs are operated and to act as a representative of the office of the state PACE ombudsman.

"Long-term care facility" or "facility" means:

A nursing care facility as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (14), C.R.S.;

An assisted living residence as defined in section 25-27-102 (1.3), C.R.S.;

Any swing bed in an extended care facility; and

A mental health facility participating in the pilot program established pursuant to section 25-3-123.

"Office" means the state long-term care ombudsman office.

"Older Americans act" means the federal "Older Americans Act of 1965", as amended, 42 U.S.C. sec. 3001.

(5.3) "PACE" means a nonprofit or for-profit program of all-inclusive care for the elderly operated pursuant to section 25.5-5-412, C.R.S.

(5.5) "PACE participant" means any individual who is a current or prospective or former participant in any PACE program in the state.

"Resident" means any individual who is a current or prospective or former patient or client of any long-term care facility.

"State long-term care ombudsman" means the person designated to implement the state long-term care ombudsman program and to perform the duties and functions required under this article.

"State PACE ombudsman" means the person designated to implement the duties and functions required pursuant to section 26-11.5-113.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1402, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 91:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1857, § 18, effective April 11.

L. 2003:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1999, § 54, effective May 22.

L. 2006:

(3)(a) amended, p. 2019, § 105, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(5.3), (5.5), and (8) added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1119, § 3, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

IP and (5.5) amended, (1) repealed, and (2.5) added, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1900, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(3)(c) amended and (3)(d) added, (HB 19-1160), ch. 225, p. 2262, § 3, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1160, see section 1 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

26-11.5-104. Creation of state and local long-term care and PACE ombudsman programs.

Pursuant to the older Americans act, there is hereby established a state long-term care ombudsman program which shall be comprised of a state long-term care ombudsman office and local ombudsman offices established throughout the state.

The state long-term care ombudsman office shall be established and operated under the state department of human services either directly or by contract with or grant to any public agency or other appropriate private nonprofit organization; except that such office shall not be administered by any agency or organization responsible for licensing or certifying long-term care services in the state. The office shall be administered by a full-time qualified state long-term care ombudsman who shall be designated in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state department.

Local long-term care and PACE ombudsman programs shall be established statewide. Such programs shall be operated by the state department under contract, grant, or agreement between the state department and a public agency or an appropriate private nonprofit organization. Personnel of local long-term care ombudsman programs must be trained and designated as qualified representatives of the office in accordance with section 26-11.5-105 (1)(b). Personnel of local PACE ombudsman programs must be trained and designated as qualified representatives of the office in accordance with section 26-11.5-113 (1)(a.5).

A state PACE ombudsman office is established in the state long-term care ombudsman program to carry out the duties set forth in section 26-11.5-113.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1402, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2707, § 275, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(4) added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1119, § 4, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1900, § 2, effective June 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-11.5-105. Duties of state long-term care ombudsman.

In addition to such other duties and functions as the state department may allocate to the office, the state long-term care ombudsman has the following duties and functions in implementing a statewide long-term care ombudsman program:

Establish statewide policies and procedures for operating the state long-term care ombudsman program including procedures to identify, investigate, and seek the resolution or referral of complaints made by or on behalf of any resident related to any action, inaction, or decision of any provider of long-term care services or of any public agency, including the state department of human services and county departments of human or social services, that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of the resident.

The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section may be applied to complaints by or on behalf of any resident of a long-term care facility where the provision of ombudsman services will either benefit residents of the facility involved in the complaint or residents of long-term care facilities in general, or where ombudsman service is the only viable avenue of assistance available to the resident and such service will not significantly diminish the program's effort on behalf of residents.

Provide training and technical assistance to personnel of local ombudsman programs. Upon successful completion of such training the office may designate such personnel as qualified representatives of the office and shall issue to such representatives long-term care ombudsman identification cards.

Establish procedures to analyze and monitor the development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and policies with respect to long-term care facilities and services. On the basis of such analysis and monitoring, the office shall recommend changes to such laws, regulations, and policies to the appropriate governing body.

Prepare a notice informing residents of ombudsman services for posting at long-term care facilities.

In addition to the duties and functions under subsection (1) of this section, the office and its representatives shall have the authority to pursue administrative, legal, or other appropriate remedies on behalf of residents for the purpose of effectively carrying out the provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1402, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 94:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 2707, § 276, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1901, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

IP(1) and (1)(a)(I) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 451, § 132, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-11.5-106. Local ombudsmen - representatives of office.

A local ombudsman or a local PACE ombudsman, whether an employee or volunteer of a local ombudsman program, is considered a representative of the office for the purposes of carrying out policies and procedures adopted by the state long-term care ombudsman or state PACE ombudsman in accordance with this article 11.5, but only upon the completion of training and designation as a qualified representative by the state long-term care ombudsman or state PACE ombudsman. As a representative of the office, a local ombudsman or a local PACE ombudsman shall follow rules of the state department and policies and procedures established by the state long-term care ombudsman or state PACE ombudsman.

Each local ombudsman or local PACE ombudsman shall carry an identification card issued annually and signed by the state long-term care ombudsman or state PACE ombudsman and shall, upon the request of a supervisory staff member of a facility, present such card in order to obtain access to residents and records of such facility.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1403, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1901, § 4, effective June 5.

26-11.5-107. Notice of ombudsman services.

Every long-term care facility shall post in a conspicuous place a notice with the name, address, and phone number of the office and the name, address, and phone number of the nearest available local ombudsman program. Such notice shall be provided by the state long-term care ombudsman.

Each long-term care facility shall provide, in writing, to any resident eligible for ombudsman services pursuant to this article who is subject to an involuntary transfer from such facility the name, address, and phone number of the nearest available local ombudsman and the name, address, and phone number of the office. Such information shall be included on the notice required under section 25-1-120 (1)(k), C.R.S.

Every PACE program shall post in a conspicuous place at all PACE facilities and provide to all PACE participants, in writing, a notice with the name, address, and phone number of the state PACE ombudsman, or his or her designee, and the name, address, and phone number of the nearest local PACE ombudsman. The state PACE ombudsman shall provide the notice to be posted by the PACE program.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1404, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2016:

(3) added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1119, § 5, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1902, § 5, effective June 5.

26-11.5-108. Access to facility - residents - records - confidentiality.

A long-term care ombudsman or PACE ombudsman, upon presenting a long-term care or PACE ombudsman identification card, must have immediate access to a long-term care facility, PACE center, or participant's residence and to its residents or participants eligible for ombudsman services pursuant to this article 11.5 for the purposes of effectively carrying out the provisions of this article 11.5.

In performing ombudsman duties and functions of their respective offices in accordance with this article, an ombudsman shall have access to review the medical and social records of a resident or PACE participant eligible for ombudsman services pursuant to this article, provided the resident or PACE participant has consented to such review. In the event consent to such review is not available because the resident or PACE participant is incapable of consenting and has no guardian to provide consent, the resident's records or PACE participant's records may be inspected by the state long-term care ombudsman or the state PACE ombudsman, respectively.

(2.5) Repealed.

In carrying out the provisions of this section, each ombudsman shall follow procedures of confidentiality in accordance with the older Americans act.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1404, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2016:

(2) amended and (2.5) added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1119, § 6, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(1) amended and (2.5) repealed, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1902, § 6, effective June 5.

26-11.5-109. Interference with ombudsmen prohibited - civil penalty.

No person shall willfully interfere with an ombudsman in the ombudsman's performance of duties and functions under this article.

No person shall take any discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action against the following individuals for any communication with an ombudsman or for any information provided in good faith to the state long-term care ombudsman office or to the state PACE ombudsman office in carrying out their respective ombudsman duties and responsibilities under this article:

Any resident eligible for ombudsman services pursuant to this article;

Any officer or employee of a facility or governmental agency providing services to residents of long-term care facilities.

Any PACE participant; or

Any officer or employee of a program, organization, facility, or governmental agency providing services to PACE participants.

Any person who commits a violation under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be subject to the following civil penalties:

For a violation of subsection (1) of this section, a penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars per violation;

For a violation of subsection (2) of this section, a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars per violation.

Any person listed in subsections (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (2)(d) of this section, or any person acting on such person's behalf, including the state or a local long-term care ombudsman or the state or a local PACE ombudsman, may file a complaint with the department of human services against any person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section. The department shall investigate such a complaint and, if there is sufficient evidence of a violation, is authorized to assess, enforce, and collect the appropriate penalty set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

Prior to the assessment of a penalty, the department of human services shall give written notice to the person against whom a penalty will be assessed, stating the basis for the violation and the amount of the penalty to be assessed. Such person, upon request, shall be given a hearing in accordance with section 24-4-105, C.R.S., which hearing shall constitute final agency action. Such agency action shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

The department of human services shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this subsection (4).

All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund. Penalties provided under this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other remedy provided by law.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1404, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 94:

(4)(a), (4)(b), and (4)(c) amended, p. 2707, § 277, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

IP(2) and (4)(a) amended and (2)(c) and (2)(d) added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1120, § 7, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1902, § 7, effective June 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

26-11.5-110. Immunity from liability.

Any long-term care ombudsman or PACE ombudsman who, in good faith, acts within the scope of the duties and functions of this article 11.5 is immune from civil or criminal liability. For the purposes of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that, when acting within the scope of the duties and functions of this article 11.5, an ombudsman acts in good faith. Nothing in this section abrogates or limits the immunity or exemption from civil liability of any agency, entity, or person under any statute, including the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1405, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1902, § 8, effective June 5.

26-11.5-111. Duties of state department - report - rules.

In order to implement the provisions of this article 11.5, the state department shall carry out the following duties:

Establish a statewide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data relating to complaints and conditions in long-term care facilities or PACE programs for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant problems, with specific provision for the submission of such data on a regular basis to the state agency responsible for licensing or certifying long-term care facilities and to the department of health care policy and financing for PACE organizations;

Establish procedures to assure that information contained in any files maintained in accordance with the state long-term care ombudsman program and state PACE ombudsman program shall be disclosed only at the discretion of the state long-term care ombudsman or the state PACE ombudsman, as applicable, and that the identity of a complainant be disclosed only with the written consent of such complainant or in accordance with a court order;

Ensure that individuals involved in the designation of the state long-term care ombudsman and the state PACE ombudsman, and any officer, employee, or volunteer of the statewide program performing ombudsman functions, do not have a conflict of interest;

Ensure that adequate legal counsel is available to an ombudsman for advice and counseling concerning the performance of ombudsman duties and functions and for legal representation of an ombudsman against whom legal action is brought in connection with the performance of ombudsman duties and functions provided for under this article;

Promulgate rules necessary for the efficient administration and operation of the state long-term care ombudsman program and state PACE ombudsman program; and

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1405, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1120, § 8, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(e) amended and (1)(f) added, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1903, § 9, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(f)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(f), effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2017, p. 1903.)

26-11.5-112. Federal requirements - compliance.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the state department or the office from complying with the requirements of the rules and regulations of the United States department of health and human services promulgated pursuant to the older Americans act.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 1406, § 1, effective April 10.

26-11.5-113. Duties of state PACE ombudsman.

The state PACE ombudsman has the following duties and functions:

No later than July 1, 2017, establish statewide policies and procedures to identify, investigate, and seek the resolution or referral of complaints made by or on behalf of a PACE participant related to any action, inaction, or decision of any PACE organization or PACE provider or of any public agency, including the state department of human services and county departments of human or social services, that may adversely affect the health, safety, welfare, or rights of the PACE participant. The policies and procedures established pursuant to this subsection (1)(a) must ensure that, while upholding the participant-directed nature of an ombudsman's advocacy, the actions of the state PACE ombudsman or local PACE ombudsmen are consistent with a PACE organization's duties and responsibilities under federal law.

No later than October 1, 2017, provide training and technical assistance to personnel of local PACE ombudsman programs. The training must be developed in consultation with PACE organizations and other persons or entities with PACE expertise, as appropriate. Upon successful completion of training, the office may designate personnel as qualified representatives of the office and, if designated, shall issue a PACE ombudsman identification card to the personnel.

Establish procedures to analyze and monitor the development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws, regulations, and policies with respect to PACE services and programs or facilities. On the basis of the analysis and monitoring, the state PACE ombudsman shall recommend to the appropriate governing body changes to laws, regulations, and policies.

No later than July 1, 2017, prepare and distribute a notice informing PACE participants of the existence of a state PACE ombudsman and the duties of the state PACE ombudsman for posting at all PACE programs and facilities, and update the notice, as necessary, to include information concerning local PACE ombudsmen.

The policies and procedures adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section may be applied to complaints by or on behalf of PACE participants where the provision of ombudsman services will either benefit other PACE participants enrolled in the same PACE program that is the subject of the complaint or PACE participants in general, or where ombudsman service is the only viable avenue of assistance available to the PACE participant and the ombudsman service will not significantly diminish the PACE organization's efforts on behalf of the participants.

In addition to the duties and functions set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the state PACE ombudsman and his or her representatives have the authority to pursue administrative, legal, or other appropriate remedies on behalf of PACE participants for the purposes of effectively carrying out the provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section and subsection (2) of this section.

The state department may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, and donations from private or public sources for the purposes of establishing the state PACE ombudsman office and implementing this section.

The PACE ombudsman fund, referred to in this paragraph (b) as the "fund", is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of gifts, grants, and donations credited to the fund pursuant to this subsection (4) and any other money that the general assembly may appropriate or transfer to the fund. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred to any other fund. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the state department may expend money from the fund for purposes of establishing the state PACE ombudsman office pursuant to this article.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1121, § 9, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(a.5) added, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1903, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 451, § 133, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(c)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(c), effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2016, p. 1121.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-11.5-114. Stakeholder process - state PACE ombudsman - reporting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-199), ch. 270, p. 1122, § 10, effective June 10.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (HB 17-1264), ch. 363, p. 1904, § 11, effective June 5.